Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1819.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4702(g) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 4702. Requirement for periodic inspection of vehicles.* * *(g) Exceptions.--The following are exceptions to subsection (f):* * *(5) Emissions inspection criteria for subject vehicles that are driven less than 5,000 miles.--A subject vehicle that is driven less than 5,000 miles in the previous 12 months as indicated by the mileage on the vehicle's safety inspection certificate or by the mileage record on the vehicle inspection database and has not been transferred to 123456789101112131415161718 another individual during the previous 12 months shall be exempt from the requirements for emission inspection. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit a subject vehicle from receiving an emissions exemption after 11 months have expired from issuance of the previous safety inspection certificate.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1819PN2239 - 2 - 1234567